District of Columbia statutes.
5-724

Delegation of functions by Mayor; promulgation of rules and regulations by Mayor.

(a)

The Mayor is hereby vested with full power and authority to delegate from time to time to his designated agent or agents any of the functions vested in him by this subchapter.

(b)

The Mayor is authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations as the Mayor may deem necessary to carry out the Mayor’s responsibilities under this subchapter.

Sept. 1, 1916, ch. 433, § 12(o), (p)
Aug. 21, 1957, 71 Stat. 398, Pub. L. 85-157, § 3
redesignated § 12(q), (r), Nov. 17, 1979, 93 Stat. 912, Pub. L. 96-122, § 209(a)(1)(A)
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 13(j), 52 DCR 2638
Life, health, and property, protection, regulations, see § 1-303.03.
Merit system, “employee” defined, see § 1-623.01.
1981 Ed., § 4-630.
1973 Ed., § 4-535.
D.C. Law 15-354 rewrote subsec. (b) which had read:
“(b) The Mayor is authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations as he may deem necessary to carry out the purposes of this subchapter.”
Delegation of Mayor’s Rulemaking Authority Pursuant to the Fire and Police Medical Leave and Limited Duty Amendment Act of 2004 and the Policemen and Firemen’s Retirement and Disability Act to the Chief, Metropolitan Police Department, see Mayor’s Order 2005-100, June 14, 2005, ( 52 DCR 8166).
Policemen and Firemen’s Retirement and Disability Act: Section 3(r) of Pub. L. 85-157 provided that this section may be cited as part of the Policemen and Firemen’s Retirement and Disability Act.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.